en: natural rye sourdough
da: naturlig rugsurdej
it: pasta madre di segale naturale
pl: naturalny zakwas żytni, zakwas naturalny żytni

en: whole rye sourdough
da: fuldkornsrugsurdej
de: Roggenvollkornsauerteig
fi: täysjyväruistaikinajuuri
hr: cijelo raženo kiselo tijesto
it: pasta madre di segale integrale
sv: surdeg av fullkornsrågmjöl, surdeg av fullkornsrågmöl, surdeg på fullkornsråg, surdeg av fullkornsråg

en: devitalised rye sourdough
fr: levain de seigle dévitalisé
nl: geïnactiveerd roggedesempoeder

en: dehydrated and devitalised rye sourdough
fr: levain de seigle déshydraté et dévitalisé

en: rye sourdough powder
da: rugsurdejspulver
it: polvere di pasta madre di segale
nl: rogge zuurdesempoeder, gedroogd roggedesem
sv: surdegspulver av råg

en: rye and wheat sourdough
sv: surdeg på råg och vete, surdeg av vete och råg

en: rye and durum wheat sourdough
sv: surdeg på råg och durumvete

en: whole rye and durum wheat sourdough
sv: surdeg på fullkornsråg och fullkornsdurumvete

en: wheat and whole rye sourdough
sv: surdeg på fullkornsråg och vete

en: spelt sourdough
da: speltsurdej
nl: speltzuurdesem
sv: surdeg av spelt

en: spelt sourdough powder
da: speltsurdejspulver
nl: speltzuurdesempoeder
sv: surdegspulver av spelt

en: rice sourdough
da: rissurdej
fr: levain de riz
nl: rijstzuurdesem
sv: rissurdeg

en: natural rice sourdough
da: naturlig rissurdej
de: Reisnatursauerteig
es: masa fermentada de arroz
fi: hapatettu riisitaikina
fr: levain naturel de riz
hr: prirodno kiselo tijesto od riže
it: lievito madre naturale di riso
pl: naturalny zakwas ryżowy

en: rice sourdough powder
da: rissurdejspulver
nl: rijstzuurdesempoeder
sv: rissurdegspulver, surdegspulver av ris

en: inactive sourdough starter
es: masa madre inactiva
hr: inaktivni suhi kvasac

en: fruit
ak: Aduaba
an: Fruita
ar: فاكهة
be: Садавіна
bg: плод
bn: ফল
bs: Voće
ca: fruita, fruites
ce: Cтом
cs: ovoce
cy: ffrwythau
da: frugt
de: Früchte, Frucht, Obst
el: Φρούτα
eo: manĝebla frukto
es: Fruta, frutas
et: Puuvili
eu: fruitu
fa: میوه
fi: hedelmä, hedelmiä, hedelmät
fr: fruit
gl: Froita
he: פרי
hi: फल
hr: voća, voće, voćna, voćni
hu: gyümölcs
hy: միրգ
ia: fructo
id: buah
it: frutta
ja: 果物, 果実
ka: ხილი
kk: Салқын тәтті тағамдар
ko: 과일
ky: Жемиштер
lb: Uebst
lv: Augļi
mk: овошје
nb: frukt
nl: vruchten
no: frukt
oc: Fruch alimentari
or: ଫଳ
pl: owoc, owoce, owoców, owocowy, owocowa, owocowe, owocowych
pt: fruta, frutos
qu: Wayu
ru: фрукт
sa: फलम्
sh: Voće
sk: ovocie
sl: Sadje
sr: воће
sv: frukt
ta: பழம்
tr: Meyve
uk: фрукт
ur: پھل
uz: Meva
vi: quả
xh: Isiqhamo
yo: èso
za: mak
zh: 水果

en: fruit purée, fruit puree
de: Fruchtpüree
es: puré de frutas
hr: voćni pire
it: frullato di frutta
nl: fruitpuree
pl: przetarte owoce, przeciery owocowe
sv: fruktpuré

en: mixed fruit
de: fruchtmischung
es: mix de frutas, mezcla de frutas
hr: miješano voće
it: frutta mista

en: mango apple mix
da: mango-æble mix
de: Mango-Apfel Mischung
fi: mango-omenasekoitus
fr: mélange de mangue et de pomme
nb: mango-eple mix
nl: mango-appel mix
sv: mango-äpple mix

en: mixed peel
it: scorza mista